Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6254.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 40-8 of the General Laws entitled "Medical Assistance" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
40-8-33. Minimum obesity coverage standards in Medicaid.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Comprehensive coverage for treatment of obesity" means coverage for prevention and
wellness nutrition counseling, intensive behavioral therapy, bariatric surgery, and FDA-approved
anti-obesity medication.
(2) "FDA-approved anti-obesity medication" means any medication approved by the U.S.
Food and Drug Administration for chronic weight management in patients with obesity.
(b) On and after July 1, 2025, the Medicaid program shall include comprehensive coverage
for treatment of obesity, to include coverage for obesity prevention and wellness, nutrition
counseling, intensive behavioral therapy, bariatric surgery, and FDA-approved anti-obesity
medication.
(c) Coverage criteria for FDA-approved anti-obesity medications provided under this
section shall not be more restrictive than the FDA-approved indications for those medicines.
(d) Coverage under this section shall be consistent with coverage for any other illness,
condition, or disorder for purposes of determining deductibles, lifetime dollar limits, copayment
and coinsurance factors, and benefit year maximum for deductibles and copayment and coinsurance
factors.

(e) Nothing shall preclude the Medicaid program’s use of utilization management to
determine the medical necessity for treatment of obesity under this section; provided that, all
appropriateness and medical necessity determinations are made in the same manner as those
determinations are made for the treatment of any other illness, condition, or disorder covered by
the state Medicaid plan.
(f) The Medicaid program shall provide notice to its enrollees regarding the coverage
required by this section. The notice shall be in writing and prominently positioned in any literature
or correspondence sent to enrollees and shall be transmitted to enrollees within calendar years 2025
and 2026 when annual information is made available to enrollees, and in any other mailing to
enrollees, but in no case later than their renewal date.
(g) The Medicaid program shall provide notice to healthcare providers and prescribers in
the state regarding the coverage required in this section. The notice shall be in writing and shall be
transmitted to healthcare providers and prescribers within both calendar years 2025 and 2026 when
annual information or Medicaid plan change information is made available to healthcare providers
and prescribers, but in no case shall the initial notice be provided later than October 31, 2025.
(h) The executive office of health and human services is directed and authorized to apply
for and obtain any necessary waiver(s), waiver amendment(s) and/or state plan amendments from
the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services including, but not
limited to, a section 1115 demonstration waiver.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002712
========
LC002712 - Page 2 of 3